pt-PT: Formato de saída de áudio: AAC; Analógico; Digital; Alta resolução; LDAC; Mono; Multizona; S/PDIF; SBC; Estéreo; Surround; aptX; Outro
zh-CN: 音频输出格式: AAC; 模拟; 数字化; 高分辨率; LDAC; Mono; 多音区; S/PDIF; SBC; 立体声; 环绕声; aptX; 其他
hu: Hangkimeneti formátum: AAC; Analóg; Digitális; Nagy felbontású; LDAC; Monó; Többzónás; S/PDIF; SBC; Sztereó; Surround; aptX; Egyéb
hr-HR: Format izlaznog audiosignala: AAC; Analogni; Digitalni; Visoka rezolucija; LDAC; Mono; Višezonski; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Ostalo
es: Formato de salida de audio: AAC; Analógico; Digital; Alta resolución; LDAC; Mono; Multizona; S/PDIF; SBC; Estéreo; Envolvente; aptX; Otros
pt-BR: Formato de saída de áudio: AAC; Analógico; Digital; Alta resolução; LDAC; Mono; Multi-zona; S/PDIF; SBC; Estéreo; Surround; aptX; Outro
cs: Formát audiovýstupu: AAC; Analogový; Digitální; Vysoké rozlišení; LDAC; Mono; Vícezónový; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Jiné
sv: Ljudutgångsformat: AAC; Analog; Digital; Hög upplösning; LDAC; Mono; Flerzoner; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Suuround; aptX; Övrigt
ko: 오디오 출력 형식: AAC; 아날로그; 디지털; 고해상도; LDAC; 모노; 다중 영역; S/PDIF; SBC; 스테레오; 서라운드; aptX; 기타
it: Formato di uscita audio: AAC; Analog; Digital; Alta risoluzione; LDAC; Mono; Multi-zone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Altro
fi: Audion ulostuloformaatti: AAC; Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Korkea resoluutio; LDAC; Mono; Monivyöhykkeinen; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Muu
ja: オーディオ出力フォーマット: AAC; アナログ; デジタル; ハイレゾ; LDAC; モノ; マルチゾーン; S/PDIF; SBC; ステレオ; サラウンド; aptX; その他
de: Audio-Ausgabeformat: AAC; Analog; Digital; Hohe Auflösung; LDAC; Mono; Multi-Zone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 音訊輸出格式: AAC; 類比; 數位; 高解析度; LDAC; 單; 多區塊; S/PDIF; SBC; 立體聲; 環繞; aptX; 其他
en: Audio output format: AAC; Analog; Digital; High-resolution; LDAC; Mono; Multi-zone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Other
tr: Ses Çıkış Formatı: AAC; Analog; Dijital; Yüksek çözünürlüklü; LDAC; Mono; Çok bölgeli; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Çevreleme; aptX; Diğer
pl: Format wyjścia audio: AAC; Analogowy; Cyfrowe; Wysokiej rozdzielczości; LDAC; Mono; Wielostrefowy; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Inne
fr: Format de sortie audio: AAC; Analogique; Numérique; Haute résolution; LDAC; Mono; Multizone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stéréo; Entourer; aptX; Autre
ro-RO: Format de ieșire audio: AAC; Analogic; Digital; De înaltă rezoluție; LDAC; Mono; Zone multiple; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Altele
th: รูปแบบเอาท์พุตเสียง: AAC; อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; ความละเอียดสูง; LDAC; ทางเดียว; หลายโซน; S/PDIF; SBC; สเตอริโอ; เซอร์ราวด์; aptX; อื่นๆ
vi: Định dạng đầu ra âm thanh: AAC; Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Độ phân giải cao; LDAC; Đơn âm; Đa vùng; S/PDIF; SBC; Âm thanh nổi; Bao quanh; aptX; Khác
sl-SI: Oblika zapisa izhodnega zvoka: AAC; Analogno; Digitalno; Visoka ločljivost; LDAC; Mono; Večpredstavnostni; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Prostorsko; aptX; Drugo
da: Lydudgangsformat: AAC; Analog; Digital; Høj opløsning; LDAC; Mono; Multi-zone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Andet
sk-SK: Výstupný zvukový formát: AAC; Analógový; Digitálny; Vysoké rozlíšenie; LDAC; Mono; Viac-zónový; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Priestorový; aptX; Iné
nl: Audio-uitvoerformaat: AAC; Analoog; Digitaal; Hoge resolutie; LDAC; Mono; Multi-zone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Andere
nb: Lydutgangsformat: AAC; Analog; Digital; Høyoppløsning; LDAC; Mono; Flersone; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Surround; aptX; Annet
bg-BG: Формат на аудиоизхода: AAC; Аналогов; Цифров; Висока разделителна способност; LDAC; Моно; Многозонов; S/PDIF; SBC; Стерео; Съраунд; aptX; Други
ru: Формат вывода звука: AAC; Аналоговый; Цифровой; Высокое разрешение; LDAC; Одноканальный; Многозональный; S/PDIF; SBC; Стерео; Объемный звук; aptX; Другой
lt-LT: Garso išvesties formatas: AAC; Analoginis; Skaitmeninis; Didelės raiškos; LDAC; Mono; Daugiazonis; S/PDIF; SBC; Stereo; Erdvinis; aptX; Kita
el: Μορφή εξόδου ήχου: AAC; Αναλογικός; Ψηφιακός; Υψηλής ανάλυσης; LDAC; Μονοφωνικός; Πολυζωνική; S/PDIF; SBC; Στέρεο; Περιφερειακή; aptX; Άλλο